Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1514.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 45-516, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE45-516. Poor quality groundwater withdrawal permit; conditions for issuance; duration of permit A. The director may issue a permit to a non-irrigation user to withdraw poor quality groundwater if he the director determines that the groundwater to be withdrawn because of its quality has no other beneficial use at the present time and that the withdrawal of such groundwater is consistent with the management plan. B. A permit issued pursuant to this section may be issued for a period of up to thirty-five years, subject to subsection C. The director shall determine the duration of the permit on the basis of the estimated life of the source of poor quality groundwater. C. The director shall monitor withdrawals of groundwater pursuant to the poor quality groundwater withdrawal permit and shall terminate the permit if the conditions specified in subsection A no longer apply. END_STATUTE